Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-915
Trust funds; investment; income; use.

The Department of Correctional Services shall invest any surplus trust funds belonging to inmates in its custody with the state investment officer. The interest accruing from any investments shall be credited to the Inmate Welfare and Club Accounts Fund created under section 83-915.01. The department shall also provide inmates with the option of having an interest-earning savings account and shall notify the inmates of such option and the terms of such account.

Laws 1973, LB 563, § 67;

Laws 1980, LB 698, § 1;

Laws 2002, LB 604, § 1.